Utah statutes.
67-4-3.   Warrants upon state treasurer -- Legislative policy.

It is the legislative purpose in the enactment of this measure to make uniform the laws of the state of Utah with respect to the preparation, issuance and drawing of warrants upon the state treasurer.

